Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1866.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 908(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 908. Prohibited offensive weapons.* * *(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Firearm." Any weapon which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon."Machinegun." As defined in 26 U.S.C. § 5845(b) (relating to definitions).1234567891011121314151617 "Machinegun conversion device." A part or combination of parts designed and intended to accelerate the rate of fire of a semiautomatic firearm to simulate the rate of fire of a machinegun."Offensive weapons." Any bomb, grenade, [machine gun,] machinegun, machinegun conversion device, sawed-off shotgun with a barrel less than 18 inches, firearm specially made or specially adapted for concealment or silent discharge, any blackjack, sandbag, metal knuckles, any stun gun, stun baton, taser or other electronic or electric weapon or other implement for the infliction of serious bodily injury which serves no common lawful purpose.* * *Section 2. Within 10 days of the effective date of this section, the Attorney General shall transmit notice describing in detail the contents of this act to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:Section 2 of this act.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect 30 days after the publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the notice under section 2 of this act.20250HB1866PN2315 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425